Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2320
Domesticated Cervine Animal Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The department may assess and collect costs and fees for services provided, fees assessed, and expenses incurred pursuant to its responsibilities under the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act. All costs and fees assessed and collected pursuant to the act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Domesticated Cervine Animal Cash Fund, which fund is hereby created. The fund shall be utilized by the department for the purpose of carrying out the act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 19;

Laws 2016, LB909, § 11.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.